Ohio, session 136, SB220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3902.65, 4765.362, and 5164.11 of 6
the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 3902.65. As used in this section, "emergency medical 8
technician-basic," "emergency medical technician-intermediate," 9
and "emergency medical technician-paramedic" have the same 10
meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. 11
Notwithstanding section 3901.71 of the Revised Code, a 12
health benefit plan issued, delivered, or renewed in this state 13
on or after the effective date of this section that directly or 14
indirectly covers health care services performed by an emergency 15
medical technician-basic, emergency medical technician- 16
intermediate, or emergency medical technician-paramedic shall 17
cover, to the same extent, health care services performed by an 18
emergency medical technician-basic, emergency medical 19
technician-intermediate, or emergency medical technician- 20

S. B. No. 220 Page 2
As Introduced
paramedic under a community paramedicine program in accordance 21
with section 4765.362 of the Revised Code. 22
Sec. 4765.362. (A) An emergency medical service 23
organization may establish a community paramedicine program in 24
accordance with the requirements of this section, to permit an 25
emergency medical technician-basic, emergency medical 26
technician-intermediate, or emergency medical technician- 27
paramedic to provide nonemergency medical services to members of 28
the community. 29
(B) A community paramedicine program established under 30
this section shall operate under the direction of the emergency 31
medical service organization's medical director or cooperating 32
physician advisory board. Both of the following apply regarding 33
a community paramedicine program: 34
(1) The medical director or cooperating physician advisory 35
board shall establish all of the following: 36
(a) Nonemergency medical services that may be provided by 37
an EMT-basic, EMT-intermediate, or paramedic under the community 38
paramedicine program, which may include: 39
(i) Chronic disease management and prevention; 40
(ii) Health evaluation and assessment; 41
(iii) Home safety inspection and fall prevention; 42
(iv) Health education; 43
(v) Medication compliance; 44
(vi) Referral to other community services; 45
(vii) Enhanced access to other health care services; 46
(viii) Management of patients following surgery; 47

S. B. No. 220 Page 3
As Introduced
(ix) Care coordination. 48
(b) A protocol to be followed when an EMT-basic, EMT- 49
intermediate, or paramedic provides nonemergency medical 50
services under the community paramedicine program; 51
(c) Any training requirements that must be satisfied to 52
provide nonemergency medical services under the community 53
paramedicine program; 54
(d) Any continuing education requirements that must be 55
satisfied to continue providing nonemergency medical services 56
under the community paramedicine program. 57
(2) The medical director or cooperating physician advisory 58
board may establish either of the following: 59
(a) Partnerships with licensed health care professionals, 60
health care facilities, and other nonprofit and for-profit 61
health care entities; 62
(b) Plans for identifying social determinants of health 63
and providing collaborative health services to at-risk residents 64
living in the community served by the community paramedicine 65
program. 66
(C) Nonemergency medical services provided through a 67
community paramedicine program in accordance with this section 68
may be provided through telehealth. 69
Sec. 5164.11. (A) As used in this section, "emergency 70
medical service organization," "emergency medical technician- 71
basic," "emergency medical technician-intermediate," and 72
"emergency medical technician-paramedic" have the same meanings 73
as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. 74
(B) The medicaid program shall cover services provided 75

S. B. No. 220 Page 4
As Introduced
under a community paramedicine program established under section 76
4765.362 of the Revised Code if all of the following conditions 77
are satisfied: 78
(1) The emergency medical service organization operating 79
the community paramedicine program holds a valid medicaid 80
provider agreement; 81
(2) The community paramedicine program provides services 82
to medicaid recipients; 83
(3) The services provided by an emergency medical 84
technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, or 85
emergency medical technician-paramedic under the community 86
paramedicine program are provided in accordance with section 87
4765.362 of the Revised Code. 88